Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.431, is amended to read: 97A.431 MOOSE LICENSESnew text begin ; MOOSE RESEARCH ACCOUNTnew text end . Subdivision 1. Number of licenses; party size. new text begin (a) new text end The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end include in a rule setting the dates for a moose season: (1) the number of licenses to be issued; and (2) the size of a moose hunting party, not to exceed six persons. new text begin (b) The commissioner must issue at least four moose licenses each year as follows: new text end new text begin (1) at least two moose licenses must be issued through a lottery system under subdivision 4a; and new text end new text begin (2) at least two moose licenses must be issued through a public auction as provided under subdivision 4b. new text end Subd. 2. Eligibility. new text begin (a) new text end Persons eligible for a moose license deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be determined under this section and commissioner's rule. A person is eligible for a moose license only if the persondeleted text begin :deleted text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end is a residentdeleted text begin ; anddeleted text end deleted text begin (2) has not been issued a moose license after January 1, 1991deleted text end new text begin , except as provided under subdivision 4bnew text end . new text begin (b) A person who has received a moose license within the past ten years is ineligible for the moose license lottery under subdivision 4a and may not submit a moose license lottery application. new text end Subd. 3. Application for license. new text begin (a) new text end An application for a moose licensenew text begin , the moose license lottery, or the moose license auctionnew text end must be on a form provided by the commissioner and accompanied by a deleted text begin $4deleted text end nonrefundable application fee deleted text begin per persondeleted text end new text begin as follows:new text end new text begin (1) for a moose license during an open season, $25 per person; new text end new text begin (2) for a moose license lottery under subdivision 4a, $25 per person; and new text end new text begin (3) for a moose license auction under subdivision 4b, $25 per personnew text end . new text begin (b) new text end A person may not make more than one application for each new text begin type of license per new text end season. If a person makes more than one applicationnew text begin for a license typenew text end , the person is ineligible for a license for that season after determination by the commissioner, without a hearing.new text begin A person may be issued only one moose license per year.new text end Subd. 4. Separate selection; eligibility. (a) The commissioner may conduct a separate selection for up to 20 percent of the moose licenses to be issued for an area. Only owners of, and tenants living on, at least 160 acres of agricultural or grazing land in the area, and their family members, are eligible for the separate selection under this paragraph. (b) The commissioner must conduct a separate selection for 20 percent of the moose licenses to be issued each year. Only individuals who have applied at least ten times for a moose license and who have never received a license are eligible for this separate selection. (c) The commissioner may by rule establish criteria for: (1) determining eligible family members under paragraph (a); and (2) verifying that an individual has made at least ten unsuccessful applications for the purposes of paragraph (b). (d) A person who is unsuccessful in a separate selection under this subdivision must be included in the selection for the remaining licenses. new text begin Subd. 4a. new text end new text begin Moose license lottery. new text end new text begin The commissioner must hold an annual moose license lottery to select and award moose licenses to selected eligible applicants. The commissioner must provide a successful applicant with a notice and instructions for purchasing a license. Successful applicants who do not purchase a license according to the instructions must be disqualified. new text end new text begin Subd. 4b. new text end new text begin Moose license auction. new text end new text begin The commissioner must hold an annual public moose license auction open to all eligible applicants. The commissioner must provide the highest eligible bidders the opportunity to purchase a moose license. The commissioner must provide a successful bidder with a notice and instructions for obtaining the license. A successful bidder who does not submit the winning bid amount and purchase a license according to the instructions provided must be disqualified. Residents and nonresidents are eligible for a license issued under this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Moose research account. new text end new text begin The moose research account is created in the game and fish fund. Revenue from moose license application fees, moose licenses, and revenue from moose license auctions must be credited to the moose research account and is appropriated to the commissioner to: new text end new text begin (1) evaluate adult moose mortality; new text end new text begin (2) examine the survival, recruitment, and mortality of moose calves; new text end new text begin (3) monitor mortality factors, including disease prevalence and parasite loads; new text end new text begin (4) examine moose-habitat relationships to identify critical summer and winter habitats; and new text end new text begin (5) otherwise support the goals of the moose management and research plan required under Laws 2008, chapter 368, article 2, section 76. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.475, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Nonresident hunting. (a) Fees for the following licenses, to be issued to nonresidents, are: (1) for persons age 18 or over to take small game, $90.50; (2) for persons age 18 or over to take deer with firearms during the regular firearms season, $180; (3) for persons age 18 or over to take deer by archery, $180; (4) for persons age 18 or over to take deer by muzzleloader during the muzzleloader season, $180; (5) for persons age 18 or over to take bear, $225; (6) for persons age 18 or over to take turkey, $91; (7) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take turkey, $5; (8) to take raccoon or bobcat, $178; (9) to take light geese during the light goose conservation order, $2.50; (10) to take sandhill crane during the sandhill crane season, $3; (11) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take deer with firearms during the regular firearms season in any open season option or time period, $5; (12) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take deer by archery, $5; (13) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take deer during the muzzleloader season, $5; (14) for persons age 13 or over and under 18 to take bear, $5; (15) for persons age 18 or over to take small game for a consecutive 72-hour period selected by the licensee, $75, of which an amount equal to one-half of the fee for the migratory-waterfowl stamp under subdivision 5, clause (1), shall be deposited in the waterfowl habitat improvement account under section 97A.075, subdivision 2; one-half of the fee for the pheasant stamp under subdivision 5, clause (2), shall be deposited in the pheasant habitat improvement account under section 97A.075, subdivision 4; and one-half of the small-game surcharge under subdivision 4, shall be deposited into the wildlife acquisition account; (16) for persons age 16 or 17 to take small game, $5; (17) to take wolf, $250; (18) for persons age 12 and under to take turkey, no fee; (19) for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take deer by firearm, no fee; (20) for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take deer by archery, no fee; (21) for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take deer by muzzleloader during the muzzleloader season, no fee; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (22) for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take bear, no feenew text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (23) for successful bidders obtaining a moose license under section 97A.431, subdivision 4b, $500new text end . (b) A $5 surcharge shall be added to nonresident hunting licenses issued under paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (6) and (8). An additional commission may not be assessed on this surcharge. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.505, is amended to read: 97B.505 MOOSE SEASON AND RESTRICTIONS. new text begin (a) new text end The commissioner may, by rule, prescribe the open season and the areas and conditions for deleted text begin thedeleted text end taking deleted text begin ofdeleted text end moose. new text begin (b) The commissioner must make the number of licenses to be offered, season dates, areas, and conditions for taking moose under moose licenses issued under section 97A.431, subdivisions 4a and 4b, publicly available at least 60 days before any applicable application deadline. new text end